North Dakota statutes. TITLE 48 Public Buildings
CHAPTER 48-01.2 Public Improvement Bids and Contracts
48-01.2-21.
Selection process for construction management at-risk services — Construction services.

After the governing body and the construction manager at-risk have finalized the contract for planning and design phase services and the process has progressed sufficiently to provide the construction manager at-risk the necessary project details, the governing body and the construction manager at-risk shall enter negotiations for a guaranteed maximum price and contract terms for the general construction of the public improvement. If the governing body is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the highest qualified person on the list of finalists, the governing body shall terminate negotiations with that person. The governing body shall commence negotiations with the next most qualified person on the list in sequence until an agreement is reached or a determination is made to reject all persons on the list. If the governing body reaches an agreement with a construction manager at-risk on a guaranteed maximum price and on contract terms, the governing body and construction manager at-risk shall enter a written contract for the general construction management at-risk construction services.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-22.
Subcontractor bids.

An agency construction manager selected for a public improvement shall publicly advertise and publicly open bids from subcontractors for the work items necessary to complete the general construction portions of the improvement. The governing body may influence the selection of the subcontractors, but only insofar as the governing body’s past experience with a subcontractor or a current legal dispute with a subcontractor.

A construction manager at-risk selected for a public improvement shall publicly advertise and publicly open bids from subcontractors for the work items the construction manager at-risk chooses not to perform. The construction manager at-risk then shall evaluate the bids and determine which is the most responsible. The governing body may influence the selection of the subcontractors, but only insofar as the governing body’s past experience with a subcontractor or a current legal dispute with a subcontractor.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2015, ch. 319, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 321, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 319, S.L. 2233 became effective August 1, 2015.

48-01.2-23.
Bond required.

An agency construction manager, before starting any work, shall provide the governing body with a bond that is equal to the cost of the agency construction manager’s services with the governing body. Under an agency construction manager delivery method, each contractor performing services on the public improvement shall provide the governing body with a separate bond for the contractor’s portion of the public improvement.

A construction manager at-risk, before starting any construction, shall provide the governing body with a bond in an amount at least equal to the amount of the guaranteed maximum price. The bond must be conditioned to be void if the contractor and all subcontractors fully perform all terms, conditions, and provisions of the construction services contract and pay all bills or claims on account of labor and materials, including supplies used for machinery and equipment, performed, furnished, and used in the performance of the contract, including all demands of subcontractors. The requirement that bills and claims be paid must include the requirement that interest of the amount authorized under section 13-01.1-02 be paid on bills and claims not paid within ninety days. The bond is security for all bills, claims, and demands until fully paid, with preference to labor and material suppliers as to payment. The bond must run to the governing body, but any person having a lawful claim against the contractor may sue on the bond. Under a construction manager at-risk delivery method, the governing body may not require each contractor performing services on the public improvement to provide a separate bond for the contractor’s portion of the public improvement.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2015, ch. 320, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 322, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 320, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

48-01.2-24.
Public buildings and facilities — Statement of compliance with accessibility guidelines.

Each governing body shall require a statement from any person preparing the plans and specifications for a public building or facility that, in the professional judgment of that person, the plans and specifications are in conformance with the Americans with Disabilities Act accessibility guidelines for buildings and facilities as contained in the appendix to title 28, Code of Federal Regulations, part 36 [28 CFR 36], subject to the exception stated in section 54-21.3-04.1.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-25.
Authorization of expansion of public improvements by legislative assembly or budget section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a state agency or institution may not significantly change or expand a public improvement beyond what has been approved by the legislative assembly unless the legislative assembly approves the change or expansion of the project or any additional expenditure for the project. During the time the legislative assembly is not in session, and unless otherwise restricted by previous legislative action or other law, the budget section may approve a change or expansion or any additional expenditure for the project. However, the budget section may not approve a change, expansion, or additional expenditure for the project during the six months preceding the convening of a regular session or during the three months following the close of a regular session except for changes in project scope and related additional expenditures resulting from an unforeseen emergency event. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9. For the purposes of this section, a significant change or expansion includes the construction of an addition to a building, including skywalks or other type of enclosed walkway, or any other substantial increase in the area of the building, but does not include the construction of building entrances and stairwells.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2013, ch. 357, § 2; 2019, ch. 438, § 9, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 357, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.